Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,105
Accidents; reports; statements; not available in trial arising out of accident involved; exception.

No report and no statement contained in a report submitted pursuant to sections 60-6,101 to 60-6,104 or any part thereof shall be made available for any purpose in any trial arising out of the accident involved unless necessary solely to prove compliance with such sections.

Laws 1974, LB 66, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.10;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 201.

Where in course of autopsy, and not for purpose of complying with statute in effect at time of accident, coroner compiled information as to alcohol content of blood, his testimony was not inadmissible in wrongful death case. Blackledge v. Martin K. Eby Constr. Co., Inc. 542 F.2d 474 (8th Cir. 1976).